Hawaii, session 2026, HB1974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that hearing loss is a significant public health concern that affects individuals from keiki to kupuna.  National and state-level data indicate that tens of thousands of Hawaii residents experience some degree of hearing loss, including many who report serious hearing difficulty or deafness.  Hearing loss becomes increasingly common with age, affecting roughly one-third of adults in their sixties, a majority of adults in their seventies, and most adults in their eighties. The legislature further finds that despite the prevalence of hearing loss, it remains widely underdiagnosed and undertreated.  Although newborn hearing screenings are in place, Hawaii lacks a coordinated statewide approach to screening and follow-up for school-age children and adults.  Primary care providers often receive limited training and reimbursement incentives to screen for hearing loss, hearing aids and assistive devices remain prohibitively expensive for many residents, and pathways to diagnosis and treatment are frequently fragmented and difficult to navigate.  Untreated hearing loss increases risk of cognitive decline and dementia, falls, social isolation and mental health issues, reduced workforce participation, caregiver burden, and costly institutional care.  There is critical need for a coordinated statewide strategy to address these medical, social, educational, and economic impacts. The purpose of this Act is to require the state health planning and development agency to develop a comprehensive state plan on hearing loss focused on improving access, affordability, awareness, and early detection of hearing loss in collaboration with community stakeholders, relevant advisory boards, and state agencies. SECTION 2.  Chapter 323D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§323D-     State plan on hearing loss.  (a) The state agency shall develop and publish a state plan on hearing loss.  The state plan on hearing loss shall include but not be limited to: (1)  An assessment of current policies, efforts, and initiatives addressing hearing loss in the State; (2)  Epidemiological data on hearing loss in the State, including prevalence by age group, geographic area, and socioeconomic status; (3)  An analysis of public awareness and social perception of hearing loss; (4)  Identification of gaps in screening and early detection for school-age children, adults, and kupuna; (5)  Information on access to care and treatment, including hearing aids, cochlear implants, and audiological services; (6)  Information on workforce development and training for primary care providers, educators, and hearing health professionals; (7)  Associated health concerns, including cognitive decline, dementia, mental health impacts, fall risk, and communication barriers; (8)  Recommendations for improving access to services, affordability of assistive technologies, and availability of communication supports, including state policy suggestions; and (9)  Identification of pilot or demonstration projects to expand hearing screening, tele-audiology access, and community-based outreach. (b)  In developing the state plan on hearing loss, the state agency may consult with pertinent stakeholders, including: (1)  Community-based organizations serving individuals with hearing loss; (2)  Health care providers, audiologists, and speech-language pathologists; and (3)  Individuals experiencing hearing loss. (c)  The state agency shall publish and submit an initial state plan on hearing loss to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027 and an update report pursuant to subsection (d) to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2029 and each odd-numbered regular session thereafter. (d)  The state agency shall prepare an update report on the state plan on hearing loss covering the most recently completed fiscal biennium.  The update report shall include information on progress made toward the goals of the state plan on hearing loss.  In addition, an update report shall include: (1)  An implementation work plan specifying the tasks, timelines, and milestones for each goal; (2)  Efforts taken by the State to achieve the goals and strategies identified in the most recent state plan on hearing loss; (3)  Recommendations for state policy, program development, or legislation relating to hearing loss, and communication access; and (4)  A review of services and initiatives coordinated among public and private agencies to meet the needs of individuals with hearing loss and their families." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $100,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the state health planning and development agency to develop and publish the state plan on hearing loss, including: (1)  Coordinating the development of the state plan on hearing loss through project management and interagency collaboration; (2)  Engaging stakeholders statewide, including kupuna, health care providers, educators, and community-based organizations, to identify needs, gaps, and opportunities; (3)  Consulting with experts and technical advisors in hearing health, aging, and disability services to inform plan recommendations; and (4)  Drafting, reviewing, and publishing the state plan on hearing loss for submission to the legislature. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state health planning and development agency for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________